Nevada, session 83, SB33.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 223.420 is hereby amended to read as follows:
223.420 The Director of the Office of Finance is responsible
for the administration, through the divisions of the Office, of the
provisions of NRS 235.005 to 235.016, inclusive, 353.150 to
353.246, inclusive, except NRS 353.226 to 353.229, inclusive, and
353A.031 to 353A.100, inclusive, and all other provisions of law
relating to the functions of the divisions of the Office.
Sec. 2. NRS 223.430 is hereby amended to read as follows:
223.430 1. The Director of the Office of Finance shall
appoint [a Chief] an Administrator of the Budget Division . [, who]
2. The Administrator of the Budget Division serves at the
pleasure of the Director and is in the unclassified service of the State
. [, or may serve in this position if the Director has the qualifications
required by NRS 353.175.]
Sec. 3. NRS 223.450 is hereby amended to read as follows:
223.450 1. Unless federal law or regulation otherwise
requires, the [Chief] Administrator of the Budget Division and the
Administrator of the Division of Internal Audits may appoint a
Deputy and a Chief Assistant in the unclassified service of the State,
who shall not engage in any other gainful employment or
occupation except as otherwise provided in NRS 284.143.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 1 and NRS
223.410, 223.430 and 223.440, employees of the Office of Finance
are in the classified service of the State.
Sec. 4. NRS 231.3729 is hereby amended to read as follows:
231.3729 1. If the Office of Economic Development
approves an application for a certificate of eligibility for matching
funds submitted pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 2 of NRS
231.3725, the Office shall immediately forward a copy of the
certificate of eligibility which identifies the amount of the award to:
(a) The lead participant in the qualified project;
(b) The Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau;
(c) The [Chief of the Budget Division] Director of the Office of
Finance in the Office of the Governor; and
(d) The State Treasurer.
2. A qualified project may be approved for a certificate of
eligibility for matching funds pursuant to subsection 1 in an amount
not to exceed $100,000,000.
-
*SB33*

– 3 –
3. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 231.3711 to 231.3737,
inclusive, the contribution from the matching funds awarded to the
qualified project pursuant to subsection 1 must be proportional in
terms of amount, contemporaneous in terms of timing and similar in
terms of risk profile to the contribution to the cost of the
development and construction of the qualified project by the lead
participant, and:
(a) The lead participant shall pay the initial $25,000,000 of the
costs of the development and construction of the qualified project.
(b) Payments after the initial payment required by paragraph (a)
must be pro rata, based on the percentage of the total cost of the
qualified project described in paragraph (c) of subsection 3 of NRS
231.3725 to be paid from approved matching funds and those to be
paid by all other sources of project funding as set forth in an
application approved by the Office pursuant to NRS 231.3725,
except that such pro rata allocation must be adjusted such that the
matching funds are used to pay the last $10,000,000 in project costs.
(c) The procedure for making monthly draws for the cost of the
qualified project will be delineated in a trust agreement to be entered
into by the Office and the lead participant, which will ensure that no
money derived from the matching funds awarded pursuant to
subsection 1 are expended unless money of the lead participant is
previously or simultaneously expended, except for the initial
payment described in paragraph (a) and the last payment described
in paragraph (b).
Sec. 5. NRS 218G.400 is hereby amended to read as follows:
218G.400 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
each board created by the provisions of NRS 590.485 and chapters
623 to 625A, inclusive, 628, 630 to 644A, inclusive, 648, 654 and
656 of NRS shall:
(a) If the revenue of the board from all sources is less than
$200,000 for any fiscal year and, if the board is a regulatory body
pursuant to NRS 622.060, the board has submitted to the Director of
the Legislative Counsel Bureau for each quarter of that fiscal year
the information required by NRS 622.100, prepare a balance sheet
for that fiscal year on the form provided by the Legislative Auditor
and file the balance sheet with the Legislative Auditor and the
[Chief of the Budget Division] Director of the Office of Finance on
or before December 1 following the end of that fiscal year. The
Legislative Auditor shall prepare and make available a form that
must be used by a board to prepare such a balance sheet.
(b) If the revenue of the board from all sources is $200,000 or
more for any fiscal year, or if the board is a regulatory body
pursuant to NRS 622.060 and has failed to submit to the Director of
the Legislative Counsel Bureau for each quarter of that fiscal year
-
*SB33*

– 4 –
the information required by NRS 622.100, engage the services of a
certified public accountant or public accountant, or firm of either of
such accountants, to audit all its fiscal records for that fiscal year
and file a report of the audit with the Legislative Auditor and the
[Chief of the Budget Division] Director of the Office of Finance on
or before December 1 following the end of that fiscal year.
2. In lieu of preparing a balance sheet or having an audit
conducted for a single fiscal year, a board may engage the services
of a certified public accountant or public accountant, or firm of
either of such accountants, to audit all its fiscal records for a period
covering two successive fiscal years. If such an audit is conducted,
the board shall file the report of the audit with the Legislative
Auditor and the [Chief of the Budget Division] Director of the
Office of Finance on or before December 1 following the end of the
second fiscal year.
3. The cost of each audit conducted pursuant to subsection 1 or
2 must be paid by the board that is audited. Each such audit must be
conducted in accordance with generally accepted auditing standards,
and all financial statements must be prepared in accordance with
generally accepted principles of accounting for special revenue
funds.
4. Whether or not a board is required to have its fiscal records
audited pursuant to subsection 1 or 2, the Legislative Auditor shall
audit the fiscal records of any such board whenever directed to do so
by the Legislative Commission. When the Legislative Commission
directs such an audit, the Legislative Commission shall also
determine who is to pay the cost of the audit.
5. A person who is a state officer or employee of a board is
guilty of nonfeasance if the person:
(a) Is responsible for preparing a balance sheet or having an
audit conducted pursuant to this section or is responsible for
preparing or maintaining the fiscal records that are necessary to
prepare a balance sheet or have an audit conducted pursuant to this
section; and
(b) Knowingly fails to prepare the balance sheet or have the
audit conducted pursuant to this section or knowingly fails to
prepare or maintain the fiscal records that are necessary to prepare a
balance sheet or have an audit conducted pursuant to this section.
6. In addition to any other remedy or penalty, a person who is
guilty of nonfeasance pursuant to this section forfeits the person’s
state office or employment and may not be appointed to a state
office or position of state employment for a period of 2 years
following the forfeiture. The provisions of this subsection do not
apply to a state officer who may be removed from office only by
impeachment pursuant to Article 7 of the Nevada Constitution.
-
*SB33*

– 5 –
Sec. 6. NRS 242.221 is hereby amended to read as follows:
242.221 1. All claims made pursuant to NRS 242.122 to
242.241, inclusive, must, when approved by the Office, be paid as
other claims against the State are paid.
2. If the State Controller finds that current claims against the
Fund for Information Services exceed the amount available in the
Fund to pay the claims, the State Controller may advance
temporarily from the State General Fund to the Fund the amount
required to pay the claims, but no more than 25 percent of the
revenue expected to be received in the current fiscal year from any
source authorized for the Fund. No amount may be transferred
unless requested by the [Chief of the Budget Division] Director of
the Office of Finance created by NRS 223.400.
Sec. 7. NRS 244.339 is hereby amended to read as follows:
244.339 1. An owner of real property who intends to allow
the real property, including, without limitation, land or
improvements on the real property, to be used as a community
garden or urban farm may submit a request to the board of county
commissioners of the county in which the real property is located
for a partial abatement of the ad valorem taxes imposed pursuant to
chapter 361 of NRS for the parcel on which the community garden
or urban farm is located. If the real property is located in a city, the
application must include, without limitation, proof that the
governing body of the city has issued any necessary approvals for
the use of the real property as a community garden or urban farm.
2. If the board of county commissioners receives an application
pursuant to subsection 1, the board must provide notification of the
application to:
(a) The [Chief of the Budget Division] Director of the Office of
Finance;
(b) The county assessor;
(c) The county treasurer; and
(d) The governing body of the city where the property is located,
if applicable.
3. The board of county commissioners shall hold a public
hearing on the application not less than 30 days after providing
notification of the application pursuant to subsection 2 and may
approve the application after the public hearing if:
(a) The applicant demonstrates that the property is suitable for
use as a community garden or urban farm;
(b) The applicant and the person operating the community
garden or urban farm are willing and able to use the real property as
a community garden or urban farm for a period of not less than 5
years; and
-
*SB33*

– 6 –
(c) The applicant enters into an agreement requiring the
operation of the community garden or urban farm on the property
for not less than 5 years beginning on the date of approval of the
application.
4. If the board of county commissioners approves an
application pursuant to this section, the applicant shall receive a
partial abatement of the ad valorem taxes imposed pursuant to
chapter 361 of NRS that is equal to 10 percent of the ad valorem
taxes otherwise due for the parcel on which the community garden
or urban farm is located for a period of 5 years, beginning on the
July 1 of the fiscal year immediately following the date of approval
of the application.
5. If the owner of real property receives a partial abatement of
ad valorem taxes pursuant to this section, the owner shall record the
approval of the abatement with the county recorder to ensure
subsequent buyers have notice of the terms of the partial abatement.
6. If the real property of the person receiving the partial
abatement pursuant to this section ceases to be used as a community
garden or urban farm before the time specified in the agreement
described in paragraph (c) of subsection 3 or the person ceases to
comply with the terms of the agreement, the owner shall:
(a) Repay to the county treasurer the amount of the abatement
that was authorized pursuant to this section before the date on which
the property or person ceased to comply; and
(b) Pay the interest on the amount due pursuant to paragraph (a)
at the rate most recently established pursuant to NRS 99.040 for
each month, or portion thereof, from the last of the month following
the period for which the payment would have been made had the
abatement not been approved until the date of payment of the tax.
7. The board of county commissioners shall adopt an ordinance
setting forth procedures to ensure the owner is complying with the
terms of the agreement described in paragraph (c) of subsection 3
and continues to qualify for the partial abatement of ad valorem
taxes. The procedures must provide, without limitation, for the
county treasurer and county assessor to receive yearly notice as to
whether the real property continues to qualify for the partial
abatement or if the owner of the real property must be required to
repay the abatement pursuant to subsection 6.
8. An owner may submit a new application for an abatement
pursuant to this section after the expiration of the term of the
abatement set forth in subsection 4.
Sec. 8. NRS 285.030 is hereby amended to read as follows:
285.030 1. The controlling authority of the Merit Award
Program is the Merit Award Board.
2. The Board must be composed of five members as follows:
-
*SB33*

– 7 –
(a) Two persons who are members of the American Federation
of State, County and Municipal Employees or its successor,
designated by the executive committee of that Federation or its
successor.
(b) One member from the Budget Division of the Office of
Finance appointed by the [Chief of the Budget Division.] Director
of the Office.
(c) One member from the Division of Human Resource
Management of the Department of Administration appointed by the
Administrator of the Division.
(d) One member appointed by and representing the Governor.
3. The member from either the Budget Division of the Office
of Finance or the Division of Human Resource Management of the
Department of Administration must serve as the Secretary of the
Board.
4. The Board shall adopt regulations for transacting its business
and carrying out the provisions of this chapter.
5. Within the limits of legislative appropriations, the Board
may expend up to $5,000 per year on expenses relating to the
operation of the Board.
Sec. 9. NRS 286.282 is hereby amended to read as follows:
286.282 The [Chief of the Budget Division] Director of the
Office of Finance shall advise the Governor in the discharge of the
responsibility for reviewing the System’s administrative policies and
performance standards under this chapter.
Sec. 10. Chapter 353 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires,
“Director” means the Director of the Office of Finance.
Sec. 11. NRS 353.175 is hereby amended to read as follows:
353.175 1. The [Chief] Director shall have 4 years of
responsible experience and education in accounting, public budget
administration, governmental research, or in a related position
involving administrative or financial responsibility, or any
equivalent combination of experience or training.
2. The [Chief] Director shall be selected with special reference
to his or her training, experience, capacity and interest in the
activities embraced within NRS 353.150 to 353.246, inclusive. The
[Chief’s] Director’s knowledge and abilities should include the
following:
(a) A comprehensive knowledge of the principles and practices
of public budgeting and governmental accounting, and a working
knowledge of statistical methods.
-
*SB33*

– 8 –
(b) An extensive knowledge of the organization and operations
of state departments, agencies and institutions, and of statutes and
regulations governing state budgeting and accounting.
(c) An extensive knowledge of principles of public organization
and administration.
(d) Administrative ability in the direction of staff analyses of
state budgetary and other operations, and in the maintenance of
effective working relationships with all state officials concerned
with budget administration.
(e) The ability to organize and present clearly oral and written
reports of findings and recommendations.
Sec. 12. NRS 353.185 is hereby amended to read as follows:
353.185 The powers and duties of the [Chief] Director are:
1. To appraise the quantity and quality of services rendered by
each agency in the Executive Department of the State Government,
and the needs for such services and for any new services.
2. To develop plans for improvements and economies in
organization and operation of the Executive Department, and to
install such plans as are approved by the respective heads of the
various agencies of the Executive Department, or as are directed to
be installed by the Governor or the Legislature.
3. To cooperate with the State Public Works Division of the
Department of Administration in developing comprehensive, long-
range plans for capital improvements and the means for financing
them.
4. To devise and prescribe the forms for reports on the
operations of the agencies in the Executive Department to be
required periodically from the several agencies in the Executive
Department, and to require the several agencies to make such
reports.
5. To prepare the executive budget report for the Governor’s
approval and submission to the Legislature.
6. To prepare a proposed budget for the Executive Department
of the State Government for the next 2 fiscal years, which must:
(a) Present a complete financial plan for the next 2 fiscal years;
(b) Set forth all proposed expenditures for the administration,
operation and maintenance of the departments, institutions and
agencies of the Executive Department of the State Government,
including those operating on funds designated for specific purposes
by the Constitution or otherwise, which must include a separate
statement of:
(1) The anticipated expense, including personnel, for the
operation and maintenance of each capital improvement to be
constructed during the next 2 fiscal years and of each capital
-
*SB33*

– 9 –
improvement constructed on or after July 1, 1999, which is to be
used during those fiscal years or a future fiscal year; and
(2) The proposed source of funding for the operation and
maintenance of each capital improvement, including personnel, to
be constructed during the next 2 fiscal years;
(c) Set forth all charges for interest and debt redemption during
the next 2 fiscal years;
(d) Set forth all expenditures for capital projects to be
undertaken and executed during the next 2 fiscal years, and which
must, to the extent practicable, provide that each capital project
which exceeds a cost of $10,000,000 be scheduled to receive
funding for design and planning during one biennium and funding
for construction in the subsequent biennium; and
(e) Set forth the anticipated revenues of the State Government,
and any other additional means of financing the expenditures
proposed for the next 2 fiscal years.
7. To examine and approve work programs and allotments to
the several agencies in the Executive Department, and changes
therein, in accordance with NRS 353.220.
8. To examine and approve statements and reports on the
estimated future financial condition and the operations of the
agencies in the Executive Department of the State Government and
the several budgetary units that have been prepared by those
agencies and budgetary units, before the reports are released to the
Governor, to the Legislature or for publication.
9. To receive and deal with requests for information as to the
budgetary status and operations of the executive agencies of the
State Government.
10. To prepare such statements of unit costs and other statistics
relating to cost as may be required from time to time, or requested
by the Governor or the Legislature.
11. To do and perform such other and further duties relative to
the development and submission of an adequate proposed budget for
the Executive Department of the State Government of the State of
Nevada as the Governor may require.
Sec. 13. NRS 353.195 is hereby amended to read as follows:
353.195 The [Chief] Director may:
1. Examine all public accounts of agencies in the Executive
Department of the State Government.
2. Administer an oath to and examine under oath, when the
[Chief] Director deems it necessary, any public official in the
Executive Department of the State Government in relation to or
concerning his or her books and accounts.
Sec. 14. NRS 353.200 is hereby amended to read as follows:
353.200 The [Chief] Director shall have authority:
-
*SB33*

– 10 –
1. To investigate duplication of work of departments,
institutions and agencies in the Executive Department of the State
Government.
2. To investigate and study the organization and administration
of departments, institutions and agencies in the Executive
Department of the State Government.
3. To formulate plans for better and more effective
management.
4. To prepare and report to the Governor or the Legislature,
when requested, any information, financial data or statistics which
the Governor or Legislature may require, such as monthly or
quarterly estimates of the State’s income and cost figures and
information on the current operation of the Executive Department of
the State Government.
Sec. 15. NRS 353.205 is hereby amended to read as follows:
353.205 1. The proposed budget for the Executive
Department of the State Government for each fiscal year must be set
up in four parts:
(a) Part 1 must consist of a budgetary message by the Governor
which includes:
(1) A general summary of the long-term performance goals
of the Executive Department of the State Government for:
(I) Core governmental functions, including the education
of pupils in kindergarten through grade 12, higher education, human
services and public safety and health; and
(II) Other governmental services;
(2) An explanation of the means by which the proposed
budget will provide adequate funding for those governmental
functions and services such that ratable progress will be made
toward achieving those long-term performance goals;
(3) An outline of any other important features of the financial
plan of the Executive Department of the State Government for the
next 2 fiscal years; and
(4) A general summary of the proposed budget setting forth
the aggregate figures of the proposed budget in such a manner as to
show the balanced relations between the total proposed expenditures
and the total anticipated revenues, together with the other means of
financing the proposed budget for the next 2 fiscal years, contrasted
with the corresponding figures for the last completed fiscal year and
fiscal year in progress. The general summary of the proposed budget
must be supported by explanatory schedules or statements,
classifying the expenditures contained therein by organizational
units, objects and funds, and the income by organizational units,
sources and funds. The organizational units may be subclassified by
-
*SB33*

– 11 –
functions and by agencies, bureaus or commissions, or in any other
manner determined by the [Chief.] Director.
(b) Part 2 must embrace the detailed budgetary estimates both of
expenditures and revenues as provided in NRS 353.150 to 353.246,
inclusive. The information must be presented in a manner which sets
forth separately the cost of continuing each program at the same
level of service as the current year and the cost, by budgetary issue,
of any recommendations to enhance or reduce that level of service.
Revenues must be summarized by type, and expenditures must be
summarized by program or budgetary account and by category of
expense. Part 2 must include:
(1) The identification of each long-term performance goal of
the Executive Department of the State Government for:
(I) Core governmental functions, including the education
of pupils in kindergarten through grade 12, higher education, human
services, and public safety and health; and
(II) Other governmental services,
 and of each intermediate objective for the next 2 fiscal years
toward achieving those goals.
(2) An explanation of the means by which the proposed
budget will provide adequate funding for those governmental
functions and services such that those intermediate objectives will
be met and progress will be made toward achieving those long-term
performance goals.
(3) A mission statement and measurement indicators for each
department, institution and other agency of the Executive
Department of the State Government, which articulate the
intermediate objectives and long-term performance goals each such
department, institution and other agency is tasked with achieving
and the particular measurement indicators tracked for each such
department, institution and other agency to determine whether the
department, institution or other agency is successful in achieving its
intermediate objectives and long-term performance goals, provided
in sufficient detail to assist the Legislature in performing an analysis
of the relative costs and benefits of program budgets and in
determining priorities for expenditures. If available, information
regarding such measurement indicators must be provided for each of
the previous 4 fiscal years. If a new measurement indicator is being
added, a rationale for that addition must be provided. If a
measurement indicator is being modified, information must be
provided regarding both the modified indicator and the indicator as
it existed before modification. If a measurement indicator is being
deleted, a rationale for that deletion and information regarding the
deleted indicator must be provided.
-
*SB33*

– 12 –
(4) Statements of the bonded indebtedness of the State
Government, showing the requirements for redemption of debt, the
debt authorized and unissued, and the condition of the sinking
funds.
(5) Any statements relative to the financial plan which the
Governor may deem desirable, or which may be required by the
Legislature.
(c) Part 3 must set forth, for the Office of Economic
Development and the Office of Energy, the results of the analyses
conducted by those offices and reported to the [Chief] Director
pursuant to NRS 353.207 for the immediately preceding 2 fiscal
years.
(d) Part 4 must include a recommendation to the Legislature for
the drafting of a general appropriation bill authorizing, by
departments, institutions and agencies, and by funds, all
expenditures of the Executive Department of the State Government
for the next 2 fiscal years, and may include recommendations to the
Legislature for the drafting of such other bills as may be required to
provide the income necessary to finance the proposed budget and to
give legal sanction to the financial plan if adopted by the
Legislature.
2. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 353.211, as soon as
each part of the proposed budget is prepared, a copy of the part must
be transmitted to the Fiscal Analysis Division of the Legislative
Counsel Bureau for confidential examination and retention.
3. Except for the information provided to the Fiscal Analysis
Division of the Legislative Counsel Bureau pursuant to NRS
353.211, parts 1 and 2 of the proposed budget are confidential until
the Governor transmits the proposed budget to the Legislature
pursuant to NRS 353.230, regardless of whether those parts are in
the possession of the Executive or Legislative Department of the
State Government. Part 4 of the proposed budget is confidential
until the bills which result from the proposed budget are introduced
in the Legislature. As soon as practicable after the Governor
transmits the proposed budget to the Legislature pursuant to NRS
353.230, the information required to be included in the proposed
budget pursuant to subparagraphs (1), (2) and (3) of paragraph (b) of
subsection 1 must be posted on the Internet websites maintained by
the Budget Division of the Office of Finance.
Sec. 16. NRS 353.207 is hereby amended to read as follows:
353.207 1. The [Chief] Director shall:
(a) Require the Office of Economic Development and the Office
of Energy each periodically to conduct an analysis of the relative
costs and benefits of each incentive for economic development
previously approved by the respective office and in effect during the
-
*SB33*

– 13 –
immediately preceding 2 fiscal years, including, without limitation,
any abatement of taxes approved by the Office of Economic
Development pursuant to NRS 274.310, 274.320, 274.330, 360.750,
360.753, 360.754, 360.890, 360.950, 361.0687, 374.357 or
701A.210, to assist the Governor and the Legislature in determining
whether the economic benefits of the incentive have accomplished
the purposes of the statute pursuant to which the incentive was
approved and warrant additional incentives of that kind;
(b) Require each office to report in writing to the [Chief]
Director the results of the analysis conducted by the office pursuant
to paragraph (a); and
(c) Establish a schedule for performing and reporting the results
of the analysis required by paragraph (a) which ensures that the
results of the analysis reported by each office are included in the
proposed budget prepared pursuant to NRS 353.205, as required by
that section.
2. Each report prepared for the [Chief] Director pursuant to
this section is a public record and is open to inspection pursuant to
the provisions of NRS 239.010.
Sec. 17. NRS 353.210 is hereby amended to read as follows:
353.210 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 6 and
7, on or before September 1 of each even-numbered year, all
departments, institutions and other agencies of the Executive
Department of the State Government, and all agencies of the
Executive Department of the State Government receiving state
money, fees or other money under the authority of the State,
including those operating on money designated for specific purposes
by the Nevada Constitution or otherwise, shall prepare, on blanks
furnished them by the [Chief,] Director, and submit to the [Chief:]
Director:
(a) The number of full-time equivalent positions within the
department, institution or agency.
(b) The number of full-time equivalent positions within the
department, institution or agency that have been vacant for at least
12 months, the number of months each such position has been
vacant and the reasons for each such vacancy.
(c) Any existing contracts for services the department,
institution or agency has with temporary employment services or
other persons, the proposed expenditures for such contracts in the
next 2 fiscal years and the reasons for the use of such services. If
such contracts include any privatization contracts, a copy of each of
those privatization contracts together with:
(1) A statement specifying the duration of the privatization
contracts;
-
*SB33*

– 14 –
(2) The number of privatization contracts proposed for the
next 2 fiscal years and the estimated expenditures for the
privatization contracts; and
(3) An analysis of each of the privatization contracts, which
includes, without limitation:
(I) For the preceding, current and next fiscal years, the
annual amount required to perform each of the privatization
contracts; and
(II) For the preceding and current fiscal years, the number
of persons the department, institution or agency employed pursuant
to the privatization contracts, reflected as the equivalent full-time
position if the persons were regularly employed by the department,
institution or agency, including the equivalent hourly wage and the
cost of benefits for each job classification.
(d) If the department, institution or agency has any existing
performance contracts that it has entered into pursuant to chapter
333A of NRS, any request to reinvest any savings realized under
such a contract for the next 2 fiscal years.
(e) Estimates of expenditure requirements of the department,
institution or agency, together with all anticipated income from fees
and all other sources, for the next 2 fiscal years compared with the
corresponding figures of the last completed fiscal year and the
estimated figures for the current fiscal year.
2. The [Chief] Director shall direct that one copy of the forms
submitted pursuant to subsection 1, accompanied by every
supporting schedule and any other related material, be delivered
directly to the Fiscal Analysis Division of the Legislative Counsel
Bureau on or before September 1 of each even-numbered year.
3. The Budget Division of the Office of Finance shall give
advance notice to the Fiscal Analysis Division of the Legislative
Counsel Bureau of any conference between the Budget Division of
the Office of Finance and personnel of other state agencies
regarding budget estimates. A Fiscal Analyst of the Legislative
Counsel Bureau or his or her designated representative may attend
any such conference.
4. The estimates of expenditure requirements submitted
pursuant to subsection 1 must be classified to set forth the data of
funds, organizational units, and the character and objects of
expenditures by program or budgetary account and by category
of expense, and must include a mission statement and measurement
indicators in adequate detail to comply with the requirements of
subparagraph (3) of paragraph (b) of subsection 1 of NRS 353.205.
The organizational units may be subclassified by functions and by
agencies, bureaus or commissions, or in any other manner at the
discretion of the [Chief.] Director.
-
*SB33*

– 15 –
5. If any department, institution or other agency of the
Executive Department of the State Government, whether its money
is derived from state money or from other money collected under
the authority of the State, fails or neglects to submit estimates of its
expenditure requirements as provided in this section, the [Chief]
Director may, from any data at hand in the [Chief’s] Director’s
office or which the [Chief] Director may examine or obtain
elsewhere, make and enter a proposed budget for the department,
institution or agency in accordance with the data.
6. Agencies, bureaus, commissions and officers of the
Legislative Department, the Public Employees’ Retirement System
and the Judicial Department of the State Government shall submit to
the [Chief] Director for his or her information in preparing the
proposed executive budget the budgets which they propose to
submit to the Legislature.
7. On or before September 1 of each even-numbered year, the
Tahoe Regional Planning Agency shall submit the budget which the
Agency proposes to submit to the Legislature to:
(a) The [Chief] Director for his or her information in preparing
the proposed executive budget.
(b) The Fiscal Analysis Division of the Legislative Counsel
Bureau.
8. The information provided by a department, institution or
agency pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection 1 is a public record
and must be open to public inspection.
9. As used in this section, “privatization contract” means a
contract executed by or on behalf of a department, institution or
agency which authorizes a private entity to provide public services
which are:
(a) Substantially similar to the services performed by the public
employees of the department, institution or agency; and
(b) In lieu of the services otherwise authorized or required to be
provided by the department, institution or agency.
Sec. 18. NRS 353.211 is hereby amended to read as follows:
353.211 1. On or before October 15 of each even-numbered
year, the [Chief] Director shall provide to the Fiscal Analysis
Division of the Legislative Counsel Bureau:
(a) Computerized budget files containing the actual data
regarding revenues and expenditures for the previous year;
(b) The work programs for the current year; and
(c) Each agency’s requested budget for the next 2 fiscal years.
2. On or before December 31 of each even-numbered year, the
[Chief] Director shall provide to the Fiscal Analysis Division:
(a) Each agency’s adjusted base budget by program or budgetary
account for the next 2 fiscal years; and
-
*SB33*

– 16 –
(b) An estimated range of the costs for:
(1) Continuing the operation of State Government; and
(2) Providing elementary, secondary and higher public
education,
 at the current level of service.
3. The information provided to the Fiscal Analysis Division
pursuant to subsections 1 and 2 is open for public inspection.
4. The Governor may authorize or direct an agency to hold
public hearings on a budget submitted pursuant to paragraph (c) of
subsection 1 at any time after the material is provided pursuant to
subsection 1.
5. As used in this section, “adjusted base budget” means the
amount appropriated or authorized to support ongoing expenditures
budgeted to the agency by the Legislature for the second year of the
current biennium, as adjusted for:
(a) The removal of any one-time appropriation or authorization
that was appropriated or authorized by the Legislature to the agency
for the second year of the biennium;
(b) Statewide fringe benefits, assessments, rent, insurance
premiums and cost allocations;
(c) Contractual obligations that are approved or expired during
the current biennium;
(d) Ongoing expenditures approved by the Interim Finance
Committee during the current biennium;
(e) Any annualization of costs that occurred for part of the
second year of the current biennium;
(f) Actual caseloads incurred during the first year of the
biennium;
(g) Rate changes that are projected to affect the budget of the
agency during the next biennium; and
(h) Any other adjustment that is necessary:
(1) Based on the limit upon total proposed expenditures
calculated pursuant to NRS 353.213; or
(2) As otherwise determined by the [Chief.] Director.
Sec. 19. NRS 353.213 is hereby amended to read as follows:
353.213 1. In preparing the proposed budget for the
Executive Department of the State Government for each biennium,
the [Chief] Director shall not exceed the limit upon total proposed
expenditures for purposes other than construction and reducing any
unfunded accrued liability of the State Retirees’ Health and Welfare
Benefits Fund created by NRS 287.0436 from the State General
Fund calculated pursuant to this section. The base for each biennium
is the total expenditure, for the purposes limited, from the State
General Fund appropriated and authorized by the Legislature for the
biennium beginning on July 1, 1975.
-
*SB33*

– 17 –
2. The limit for each biennium is calculated as follows:
(a) The amount of expenditure constituting the base is
multiplied by the percentage of change in population for the current
biennium from the population on July 1, 1974, and this product is
added to or subtracted from the amount of expenditure constituting
the base.
(b) The amount calculated pursuant to paragraph (a) is
multiplied by the percentage of inflation or deflation, and this
product is added to or subtracted from the amount calculated
pursuant to paragraph (a).
(c) Subject to the limitations of this paragraph:
(1) If the amount resulting from the calculations pursuant to
paragraphs (a) and (b) represents a net increase over the base
biennium, the [Chief] Director may increase the proposed
expenditure accordingly.
(2) If the amount represents a net decrease, the [Chief]
Director shall decrease the proposed expenditure accordingly.
(3) If the amount is the same as in the base biennium, that
amount is the limit of permissible proposed expenditure.
3. The proposed budget for each fiscal year of the biennium
must provide for a reserve of:
(a) Not less than 5 percent or more than 10 percent of the total
of all proposed appropriations from the State General Fund for the
operation of all departments, institutions and agencies of the State
Government and authorized expenditures from the State General
Fund for the regulation of gaming for that fiscal year; and
(b) Commencing with the proposed budget for the period that
begins on July 1, 2011, and ends on June 30, 2013, 1 percent of
the total anticipated revenue for each of the 2 fiscal years of the
biennium for which the budget is proposed, as projected by the
Economic Forum for each of those fiscal years pursuant to
paragraph (d) of subsection 1 of NRS 353.228 and as adjusted by
any changes or adjustments to state revenue that are recommended
in the proposed budget for those fiscal years.
4. The revised estimate of population for the State issued by
the United States Department of Commerce as of July 1, 1974, must
be used, and the Governor shall certify the percentage of increase or
decrease in population for each succeeding biennium. The
Consumer Price Index published by the United States Department of
Labor for July preceding each biennium must be used in
determining the percentage of inflation or deflation.
5. The [Chief] Director may exceed the limit to the extent
necessary to meet situations in which there is a threat to life or
property.
-
*SB33*

– 18 –
6. As used in this section, “unfunded accrued liability” means a
liability with an actuarially determined value which exceeds the
value of the assets in the fund from which payments are made to
discharge the liability.
Sec. 20. NRS 353.215 is hereby amended to read as follows:
353.215 1. The Budget Division of the Office of Finance
shall maintain a computer network, computer system or other
similar means of electronic storage for the work programs of the
departments, institutions and agencies of the Executive Department
of the State Government.
2. Work programs that are included in the system established
pursuant to subsection 1 must:
(a) Include all appropriations or other funds from any source
whatever made available to the department, institution or agency for
its operation and maintenance and for the acquisition of property.
(b) Show the requested allotments of appropriations or other
funds by month or other period as the [Chief] Director may require
for the entire fiscal year.
3. Not later than July 1 of each year, the Governor, through the
[Chief,] Director, shall require the head of each department,
institution and agency of the Executive Department of the State
Government to:
(a) Review for the ensuing fiscal year its work program that is
included in the system established pursuant to subsection 1; and
(b) Notify the Governor through the [Chief] Director of any
errors or omissions in its work program.
4. The Governor, with the assistance of the [Chief,] Director,
shall review the requested allotments with respect to the work
program of each department, institution or agency, and the Governor
shall, if the Governor deems it necessary, revise, alter or change
such allotments before approving the same. The aggregate of such
allotments must not exceed the total appropriations or other funds
from any source whatever made available to the department,
institution or agency for the fiscal year in question.
5. The [Chief] Director shall transmit a copy of the allotments
as approved by the Governor to the head of the department,
institution or agency concerned, to the State Treasurer, to the State
Controller and to the Fiscal Analysis Division of the Legislative
Counsel Bureau.
6. All expenditures to be made from the appropriations or other
funds from any source whatever must be made on the basis of such
allotments and not otherwise, and must be broken down into such
classifications as the [Chief] Director may require.
-
*SB33*

– 19 –
Sec. 21. NRS 353.220 is hereby amended to read as follows:
353.220 1. The head of any department, institution or agency
of the Executive Department of the State Government, whenever he
or she deems it necessary because of changed conditions, may
request the revision of the work program of his or her department,
institution or agency at any time during the fiscal year, and submit
the revised program to the Governor through the [Chief] Director
with a request for revision of the allotments for the remainder of that
fiscal year.
2. Every request for revision must be submitted to the [Chief]
Director on the form and with supporting information as the [Chief]
Director prescribes.
3. Before encumbering any appropriated or authorized money,
every request for revision must be approved or disapproved in
writing by the Governor or the [Chief,] Director, if the Governor
has by written instrument delegated this authority to the [Chief.]
Director.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 8, whenever a
request for the revision of a work program of a department,
institution or agency in an amount more than $75,000 would, when
considered with all other changes in allotments for that work
program made pursuant to subsections 1, 2 and 3 and NRS 353.215,
increase or decrease by 20 percent or $350,000, whichever is less,
the expenditure level approved by the Legislature for any of the
allotments within the work program, the request must be approved
as provided in subsection 5 before any appropriated or authorized
money may be encumbered for the revision.
5. If a request for the revision of a work program requires
additional approval as provided in subsection 4 and:
(a) Is necessary because of an emergency as defined in NRS
353.263 or for the protection of life or property, the Governor shall
take reasonable and proper action to approve it and shall report the
action, and his or her reasons for determining that immediate action
was necessary, to the Interim Finance Committee at its first meeting
after the action is taken. Action by the Governor pursuant to this
paragraph constitutes approval of the revision, and other provisions
of this chapter requiring approval before encumbering money for the
revision do not apply.
(b) The Governor determines that the revision is necessary and
requires expeditious action, he or she may certify that the request
requires expeditious action by the Interim Finance Committee.
Whenever the Governor so certifies, the Interim Finance Committee
has 15 days after the request is submitted to its Secretary within
which to consider the revision. Any request for revision which is not
considered within the 15-day period shall be deemed approved.
-
*SB33*

– 20 –
(c) Does not qualify pursuant to paragraph (a) or (b), it must be
submitted to the Interim Finance Committee. Except as otherwise
provided in NRS 353.3375, the Interim Finance Committee has 45
days after the request is submitted to its Secretary within which to
consider the revision. Any request which is not considered within
the 45-day period shall be deemed approved.
6. The Secretary shall place each request submitted pursuant to
paragraph (b) or (c) of subsection 5 on the agenda of the next
meeting of the Interim Finance Committee.
7. In acting upon a proposed revision of a work program, the
Interim Finance Committee shall consider, among other things:
(a) The need for the proposed revision; and
(b) The intent of the Legislature in approving the budget for the
present biennium and originally enacting the statutes which the
work program is designed to effectuate.
8. The provisions of subsection 4 do not apply to any request
for the revision of a work program which is required:
(a) As a result of the acceptance of a gift or grant of property or
services pursuant to subsection 5 of NRS 353.335; or
(b) To carry forward to a fiscal year, without a change in
purpose, the unexpended balance of any money authorized for
expenditure in the immediately preceding fiscal year.
Sec. 22. NRS 353.225 is hereby amended to read as follows:
353.225 1. In order to provide some degree of flexibility to
meet emergencies arising during each fiscal year in the expenditures
for the State Education Fund and for operation and maintenance of
the various departments, institutions and agencies of the Executive
Department of the State Government, the [Chief,] Director, with the
approval in writing of the Governor, may require the State
Controller or the head of each such department, institution or agency
to set aside a reserve in such amount as the [Chief] Director may
determine, out of the total amount appropriated or out of other funds
available from any source whatever to the department, institution or
agency.
2. At any time during the fiscal year this reserve or any portion
of it may be returned to the appropriation or other fund to which it
belongs and may be added to any one or more of the allotments, if
the [Chief] Director so orders in writing.
Sec. 23. NRS 353.227 is hereby amended to read as follows:
353.227 1. The Economic Forum impaneled pursuant to NRS
353.226 shall:
(a) Elect a Chair and Vice Chair from among its members at its
first meeting;
(b) Adopt such rules governing the conduct of the Economic
Forum as it deems necessary; and
-
*SB33*

– 21 –
(c) Hold such number of meetings as may be necessary to
accomplish the tasks assigned to it in the time allotted.
2. The Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau and [Chief
of the Budget Division] the Director of the Office of Finance shall
jointly provide the Economic Forum with:
(a) Meeting rooms;
(b) Staff;
(c) Data processing services; and
(d) Clerical assistance.
3. A majority of the members constitutes a quorum and a
majority of those present must concur in any decision.
4. While engaged in the business of the Economic Forum, each
member is entitled to receive the per diem allowance and travel
expenses provided for state officers and employees generally.
5. In addition to the per diem allowance and travel expenses
provided in subsection 4, each member of the Economic Forum who
is appointed by the Governor pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS
353.226 is entitled to receive for each meeting of the Economic
Forum:
(a) Eighty dollars for 1 day of preparation for that meeting; and
(b) Eighty dollars for each day or part of a day during which the
meeting lasts.
Sec. 24. NRS 353.228 is hereby amended to read as follows:
353.228 1. The Economic Forum impaneled pursuant to NRS
353.226 shall:
(a) Make such projections for economic indicators as it deems
necessary to ensure that an accurate estimate is produced pursuant to
paragraph (b);
(b) Provide an accurate estimate of the revenue that will be
collected by the State for general, unrestricted uses, and not for
special purposes, during the biennium that begins on July 1 of the
year following the date on which the Economic Forum was
empaneled;
(c) Request such technical assistance as the Economic Forum
deems necessary from the Technical Advisory Committee created
by NRS 353.229;
(d) On or before December 3 of each even-numbered year,
prepare a written report of its projections of economic indicators and
estimate of future state revenue required by paragraphs (a) and (b)
and present the report to the Governor and the Legislature;
(e) On or before May 1 of each odd-numbered year, prepare a
written report confirming or revising the projections of economic
indicators and estimate of future state revenue contained in the
report prepared pursuant to paragraph (d) and present the report to
the Governor and the Legislature; and
-
*SB33*

– 22 –
(f) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, on or before
June 10 of each even-numbered year and December 10 of each odd-
numbered year, hold a meeting to consider current economic
indicators, including, without limitation, employment,
unemployment, personal income and any other indicators deemed
appropriate by the Economic Forum. Based on current economic
indicators, the Economic Forum shall update the status of actual
State General Fund revenue compared to the most recent forecast of
the Economic Forum. The provisions of this paragraph are not
intended to authorize the Economic Forum to make additional
forecasts pursuant to paragraph (b). At the next appropriate meeting
of the Interim Finance Committee, the Chair of the Economic
Forum or a member of the staff of the Economic Forum shall
present to the Interim Finance Committee such matters considered at
the meeting of the Economic Forum held pursuant to this paragraph,
as the Economic Forum determines appropriate. Any such
information presented to the Interim Finance Committee must be
made available on the Internet website of the Legislature.
2. If the deadline for preparing a report or holding a meeting as
required in subsection 1 falls on a Saturday, Sunday or legal
holiday, the deadline is extended to the second business day
following the deadline.
3. The Economic Forum may make preliminary projections of
economic indicators and estimates of future state revenue at any
time. Any such projections and estimates must be made available to
the various agencies of the State through the [Chief.] Director of the
Office of Finance.
4. The Economic Forum may request information directly from
any state agency, including, without limitation, the Nevada System
of Higher Education. A state agency, including, without limitation,
the Nevada System of Higher Education, that receives a reasonable
request for information from the Economic Forum shall comply
with the request as soon as is reasonably practicable after receiving
the request.
5. The Economic Forum may request direct testimony from
any state agency, including, without limitation, the Nevada System
of Higher Education, at a meeting of the Economic Forum or the
Technical Advisory Committee. The head, or a designee thereof, of
a state agency, including, without limitation, the Nevada System of
Higher Education, who receives a reasonable request for direct
testimony at a meeting of the Economic Forum or the Technical
Advisory Committee shall appear at the meeting and shall comply
with the request.
6. To carry out its duties pursuant to this section, the Economic
Forum may consider any information received from the Technical
-
*SB33*

– 23 –
Advisory Committee and any other information received from
independent sources.
7. Copies of the projections and estimates made pursuant to
this section must be made available to the public by the Director of
the Legislative Counsel Bureau for the cost of reproducing the
material.
Sec. 25. NRS 353.229 is hereby amended to read as follows:
353.229 1. The Technical Advisory Committee on Future
State Revenues, consisting of seven members, is hereby created.
2. The members of the Committee are the persons serving in
the following positions or their designees:
(a) The Senate Fiscal Analyst;
(b) The Assembly Fiscal Analyst;
(c) The [Chief of the Budget Division] Director of the Office of
Finance;
(d) The head of the Research Division of the Employment
Security Division of the Department of Employment, Training and
Rehabilitation or, if that position ceases to exist, the position
deemed by the Administrator of the Employment Security Division
to be the equivalent of that position;
(e) The Vice Chancellor for Finance of the Nevada System of
Higher Education or a person designated by the Vice Chancellor;
(f) The demographer employed pursuant to NRS 360.283; and
(g) The Chair of the Committee on Local Government Finance.
3. The Committee shall:
(a) At its first meeting and annually thereafter elect a Chair and
Vice Chair from among its members;
(b) Adopt such rules governing the conduct of the Committee as
it deems necessary;
(c) Hold such number of meetings as may be necessary to carry
out the requests made by the Economic Forum pursuant to NRS
353.228 in the most timely manner practicable; and
(d) Provide all assistance requested by the Economic Forum
pursuant to NRS 353.227.
4. A majority of the Committee constitutes a quorum and a
majority of those members present must concur in any decision.
5. Each member of the Committee who is not an officer or
employee of the State shall serve without compensation, except that
while the member is engaged in the business of the Committee he or
she is entitled to receive the per diem allowance and travel expenses
provided for state officers and employees generally.
6. Each member of the Committee who is an officer or
employee of the State must be relieved from duties without loss of
his or her regular compensation so that the member may prepare for
and attend meetings of the Committee and perform any work
-
*SB33*

– 24 –
necessary to accomplish the tasks assigned to the Committee in the
most timely manner practicable. A state agency shall not require an
officer or employee who is a member of the Committee to make up
the time he or she is absent from work to fulfill his or her
obligations as a member, nor shall it require the member to take
annual vacation or compensatory time for the absence. Such a
member shall serve on the Committee without additional
compensation, except that while the member is engaged in the
business of the Committee he or she is entitled to receive the per
diem allowance and travel expenses provided for state officers and
employees generally, which must be paid by the state agency which
employs the member.
7. The Committee may request information from any state
agency. A state agency that receives a reasonable request for
information from the Committee shall comply with the request as
soon as is reasonably practicable after receiving the request.
8. The Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau and the
[Budget Division] Director of the Office of Finance shall jointly
provide the Committee with:
(a) Meeting rooms;
(b) Staff;
(c) Data processing services; and
(d) Clerical assistance.
Sec. 26. NRS 353.230 is hereby amended to read as follows:
353.230 1. The [Chief] Director shall review the estimates,
altering, revising, increasing or decreasing the items of the estimates
as the [Chief] Director may deem necessary in view of the needs of
the various departments, institutions and agencies in the Executive
Department of the State Government and the total anticipated
income of the State Government and of the various departments,
institutions and agencies of the Executive Department during the
next fiscal year. In performing the duties required by this
subsection, the [Chief] Director shall use the projections and
estimates prepared by the Economic Forum pursuant to
NRS 353.228.
2. The [Chief] Director shall meet with a Fiscal Analyst of the
Legislative Counsel Bureau or his or her designated representative
and personnel of the various departments, institutions and agencies
of the Executive Department to discuss:
(a) The budgetary requests of each department, institution and
agency; and
(b) The budgetary recommendations of the Budget Division for
each department, institution and agency,
 for the next 2 fiscal years. The [Chief] Director shall allow the
Fiscal Analyst of the Legislative Counsel Bureau or his or her
-
*SB33*

– 25 –
designated representative full access to all materials connected with
the review.
3. The [Chief] Director shall then prepare a final version of the
proposed budget, in accordance with NRS 353.150 to 353.246,
inclusive, and shall deliver it to the Governor. The final version of
the proposed budget must include the adjusted base budget for each
department, institution and agency of the Executive Department, the
costs for continuing each program at the current level of service and
the costs, if any, for new programs, recommended enhancements of
existing programs or reductions for the departments, institutions and
agencies of the Executive Department for the next 2 fiscal years. All
projections of revenue and any other information concerning future
state revenue contained in the proposed budget must be based upon
the projections and estimates prepared by the Economic Forum
pursuant to NRS 353.228.
4. The Governor shall, not later than 14 calendar days before
the commencement of the regular legislative session, submit the
proposed budget to the Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau
for transmittal to the Legislature. The Governor shall simultaneously
submit, as a separate document:
(a) An analysis of any new programs or enhancements of
existing programs being recommended; and
(b) Any increase in or new revenues which are being
recommended in the proposed budget.
 The document must specify the total cost by department,
institution or agency of new programs or enhancements, but need
not itemize the specific costs. All projections of revenue and any
other information concerning future state revenue contained in the
document must be based upon the projections and estimates
prepared by the Economic Forum pursuant to NRS 353.228.
5. On or before the 19th calendar day of the regular legislative
session, the Governor shall submit to the Legislative Counsel
recommendations for each legislative measure which will be
necessary to carry out the final version of the proposed budget or to
carry out the Governor’s legislative agenda. These
recommendations must contain sufficient detailed information to
enable the Legislative Counsel to prepare the necessary legislative
measures.
6. During the consideration of the general appropriation bill
and any special appropriation bills and bills authorizing budgeted
expenditures by the departments, institutions and agencies operating
on money designated for specific purposes by the Constitution or
otherwise, drafted at the request of the Legislature upon the
recommendations submitted by the Governor with the proposed
budget, the Governor or a representative of the Governor have the
-
*SB33*

– 26 –
right to appear before and be heard by the appropriation committees
of the Legislature in connection with the appropriation bill or bills,
and to render any testimony, explanation or assistance required of
him or her.
7. As used in this section, “adjusted base budget” means the
amount appropriated or authorized to support ongoing expenditures
budgeted to the department, institution or agency by the Legislature
for the second year of the current biennium, as adjusted for:
(a) The removal of any one-time appropriation or authorization
that was appropriated or authorized by the Legislature to the
department, institution or agency for the second year of the
biennium;
(b) Statewide fringe benefits, assessments, rent, insurance
premiums and cost allocations;
(c) Contractual obligations that are approved or expired during
the current biennium;
(d) Ongoing expenditures approved by the Interim Finance
Committee during the current biennium;
(e) Any annualization of costs that occurred for part of the
second year of the current biennium;
(f) Actual caseloads incurred during the first year of the
biennium;
(g) Rate changes that are projected to affect the budget of the
department, institution or agency during the next biennium; and
(h) Any other adjustment that is necessary:
(1) Based on the limit upon total proposed expenditures
calculated pursuant to NRS 353.213; or
(2) As otherwise determined by the [Chief.] Director.
Sec. 27. NRS 353.245 is hereby amended to read as follows:
353.245 In addition to the requirements of NRS 353.335, every
department, institution and agency of the Executive Department of
the State Government, when making requests for budgets to be
submitted to the Federal Government for money, equipment,
material or services, shall file the request or budget with the office
of the [Chief] Director and with the Fiscal Analysis Division of the
Legislative Counsel Bureau before submitting it to the proper
federal authority. When the federal authority has approved the
request or budget, in whole or in part, the department, institution or
agency of the State Government shall resubmit it to the [Chief]
Director and to the Fiscal Analysis Division of the Legislative
Counsel Bureau for recording before any allotment or encumbrance
of the federal money is made.
Sec. 28. NRS 353.263 is hereby amended to read as follows:
353.263 1. As used in this section, “emergency” means
invasion, disaster, insurrection, riot, breach of the peace, substantial
-
*SB33*

– 27 –
threat to life or property, epidemic or the imminent danger thereof.
The term includes damage to or the disintegration of a building
owned by this state or of the mechanical or electrical system of such
a building when immediate repairs are necessary to maintain the
integrity of the structure or its mechanical or electrical system.
2. The Emergency Account is hereby created in the State
General Fund. Money for the Account must be provided by direct
legislative appropriation.
3. When the State Board of Examiners finds that an emergency
exists which requires an expenditure for which no appropriation has
been made, or in excess of an appropriation made, the Board may
authorize an expenditure from the Emergency Account to meet the
emergency.
4. The State Board of Examiners may, under such
circumstances as it deems appropriate, authorize its Clerk to
determine whether an emergency exists and approve, on behalf of
the Board, an expenditure from the Emergency Account.
5. The [Chief] Director shall enumerate expenditures from the
Account made in the preceding biennium in each executive budget
report.
6. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section to the
contrary, money in the Emergency Account may be expended for
any purpose authorized by the Legislature.
Sec. 29. NRS 353.325 is hereby amended to read as follows:
353.325 1. Each state agency, within 10 days after receiving
an audit report pertaining to that agency, including a management
letter and the agency’s reply, shall submit one copy of the audit
report to:
(a) The [Chief of the Budget Division of the Office of Finance;]
Director;
(b) The State Controller; and
(c) The Legislative Auditor.
2. The audit report, including, without limitation, the opinion
and findings of the auditor contained in the audit report, may be
disseminated by or on behalf of the state agency for which the report
was prepared by inclusion, without limitation, in or on:
(a) An official statement or other document prepared in
connection with the offering of bonds or other securities;
(b) A filing made pursuant to the laws or regulations of this
State;
(c) A filing made pursuant to a rule or regulation of the
Securities and Exchange Commission of the United States; or
(d) A website maintained by a state agency on the Internet or its
successor,
-
*SB33*

– 28 –
 without the consent of the auditor who prepared the audit report.
A provision of a contract entered into between an auditor and a state
agency that is contrary to the provisions of this subsection is against
the public policy of this State and is void and unenforceable.
Sec. 30. NRS 353.331 is hereby amended to read as follows:
353.331 The Administrator of the Administrative Services
Division of the Department of Administration shall annually prepare
and submit to the [Chief of the Budget Division of the Office of
Finance] Director a statewide cost allocation plan distributing
service agency indirect costs among the various agencies in
accordance with the principles and procedures established by federal
regulations and guidelines. The [Chief of the Budget Division]
Director shall review, revise as necessary and approve the plan.
Sec. 31. NRS 353.335 is hereby amended to read as follows:
353.335 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 5 and
6, a state agency may accept any gift or grant of property or services
from any source only if it is included in an act of the Legislature
authorizing expenditures of nonappropriated money or, when it is
not so included, if it is approved as provided in subsection 2.
2. If:
(a) Any proposed gift or grant is necessary because of an
emergency as defined in NRS 353.263 or for the protection or
preservation of life or property, the Governor shall take reasonable
and proper action to accept it and shall report the action and his or
her reasons for determining that immediate action was necessary to
the Interim Finance Committee at its first meeting after the action is
taken. Action by the Governor pursuant to this paragraph constitutes
acceptance of the gift or grant, and other provisions of this chapter
requiring approval before acceptance do not apply.
(b) The Governor determines that any proposed gift or grant
would be forfeited if the State failed to accept it before the
expiration of the period prescribed in paragraph (c), the Governor
may declare that the proposed acceptance requires expeditious
action by the Interim Finance Committee. Whenever the Governor
so declares, the Interim Finance Committee has 15 days after the
proposal is submitted to its Secretary within which to approve or
deny the acceptance. Any proposed acceptance which is not
considered within the 15-day period shall be deemed approved.
(c) The proposed acceptance of any gift or grant does not qualify
pursuant to paragraph (a) or (b), it must be submitted to the Interim
Finance Committee. Except as otherwise provided in NRS
353.3375, the Interim Finance Committee has 45 days after the
proposal is submitted to its Secretary within which to consider
acceptance. Any proposed acceptance which is not considered
within the 45-day period shall be deemed approved.
-
*SB33*

– 29 –
3. The Secretary shall place each request submitted to the
Secretary pursuant to paragraph (b) or (c) of subsection 2 on the
agenda of the next meeting of the Interim Finance Committee.
4. In acting upon a proposed gift or grant, the Interim Finance
Committee shall consider, among other things:
(a) The need for the facility or service to be provided or
improved;
(b) Any present or future commitment required of the State;
(c) The extent of the program proposed; and
(d) The condition of the national economy, and any related fiscal
or monetary policies.
5. A state agency may accept:
(a) Gifts, including grants from nongovernmental sources, not
exceeding $200,000 each in value; and
(b) Governmental grants not exceeding $200,000 each in value,
 if the gifts or grants are used for purposes which do not involve
the hiring of new employees and if the agency has the specific
approval of the Governor or, if the Governor delegates this power of
approval to the [Chief of the Budget Division of the Office of
Finance,] Director, the specific approval of the [Chief.] Director.
6. This section does not apply to:
(a) The Nevada System of Higher Education;
(b) The Department of Health and Human Services while acting
as the state health planning and development agency pursuant to
paragraph (d) of subsection 2 of NRS 439A.081 or for donations,
gifts or grants to be disbursed pursuant to NRS 433.395 or 435.490;
(c) Legal services provided on a pro bono basis by an attorney
or law firm engaged in the private practice of law to the State of
Nevada or any officer, agency or employee in the Executive
Department of the State Government pursuant to a contract for legal
services entered into by or at the request of the Attorney General in
accordance with NRS 228.112 to 228.1127, inclusive;
(d) Artifacts donated to the Department of Tourism and Cultural
Affairs;
(e) The initial $250,000 received by the Department of Wildlife
pursuant to subsection 1 of NRS 501.3585 as a gift, donation,
bequest or devise, or combination thereof, for an unanticipated
emergency event, as defined in NRS 501.3585; or
(f) A gift or grant that will be deposited in a budget account that
consists of money which is not appropriated by or authorized for
expenditure by the Legislature.
Sec. 32. NRS 353.540 is hereby amended to read as follows:
353.540 “State agency” means an agency, bureau, board,
commission, department, division or any other unit of the
government of this State that is required to submit information to
-
*SB33*

– 30 –
the [Chief] Director of the Office of Finance pursuant to subsection
1 or 6 of NRS 353.210. “State agency” does not include the Nevada
System of Higher Education unless it is anticipated that payments
under the agreement will be made with state appropriations.
Sec. 33. NRS 353.550 is hereby amended to read as follows:
353.550 1. A state agency may propose a project to acquire
real property, an interest in real property or an improvement to real
property through an agreement which has a term, including the
terms of any options for renewal, that extends beyond the biennium
in which the agreement is executed if the agreement:
(a) Provides that all obligations of the State of Nevada and the
state agency are extinguished by the failure of the Legislature to
appropriate money for the ensuing fiscal year for payments due
pursuant to the agreement;
(b) Does not encumber any property of the State of Nevada or
the state agency except for the property that is the subject of the
agreement;
(c) Provides that property of the State of Nevada and the state
agency, except for the property that is the subject of the agreement,
must not be forfeited if:
(1) The Legislature fails to appropriate money for payments
due pursuant to the agreement; or
(2) The State of Nevada or the state agency breaches the
agreement;
(d) Prohibits certificates of participation in the agreement; and
(e) For the biennium in which it is executed, does not require
payments that are greater than the amount authorized for such
payments pursuant to the applicable budget of the state agency.
2. The provisions of paragraph (d) of subsection 1 may be
waived by the Board, upon the recommendation of the State
Treasurer, if the Board determines that waiving those provisions:
(a) Is in the best interests of this State; and
(b) Complies with federal securities laws.
3. Before an agreement proposed pursuant to subsection 1 may
become effective:
(a) The proposed project must be approved by the Legislature by
concurrent resolution or statute or as part of the budget of the state
agency, or by the Interim Finance Committee when the Legislature
is not in regular session;
(b) The agency must submit the proposed agreement to the
[Chief,] Director of the Office of Finance, the Director of the
Department of Administration, the State Treasurer and the State
Land Registrar for their review and transmittal to the Board;
(c) The Board must approve the proposed agreement; and
(d) The Governor must execute the agreement.
-
*SB33*

– 31 –
Sec. 34. NRS 353.600 is hereby amended to read as follows:
353.600 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, if an
agreement pursuant to NRS 353.500 to 353.630, inclusive, involves
an improvement to property owned by the State of Nevada or the
state agency, the State Land Registrar, in consultation with the State
Treasurer and in conjunction with the agreement, upon approval of
the State Board of Examiners, may enter into a lease of the property
to which the improvement will be made if the lease:
(a) Has a term of 35 years or less; and
(b) Provides for rental payments that approximate the fair
market rental of the property before the improvement is made, as
determined by the State Land Registrar in consultation with the
State Treasurer at the time the lease is entered into, which must be
paid if the agreement terminates before the expiration of the lease
because the Legislature fails to appropriate money for payments due
pursuant to the agreement.
2. A lease entered into pursuant to this section may provide for
nominal rental payments to be paid pursuant to the lease before the
agreement terminates.
3. Before the State Land Registrar may enter into a lease
pursuant to this section:
(a) The State Land Registrar must submit the proposed lease to
the [Chief,] Director of the Office of Finance, the Director of the
Department of Administration and the State Treasurer for their
review and transmittal to the Board; and
(b) The Board must approve the lease.
Sec. 35. NRS 353.610 is hereby amended to read as follows:
353.610 Immediately after an agreement is executed pursuant
to NRS 353.550, the state agency on whose behalf the agreement
was executed shall file with the [Chief,] Director of the Office of
Finance, the Director of the Department of Administration and the
State Treasurer:
1. A fully executed copy of the agreement; and
2. A schedule of payments that indicates the principal and
interest payments due throughout the term of the agreement.
Sec. 36. NRS 358.020 is hereby amended to read as follows:
358.020 1. The Nevada Advisory Council on Federal
Assistance is hereby created. The Council consists of the following
11 members:
(a) One member of the Senate appointed by the Majority Leader
of the Senate.
(b) One member of the Assembly appointed by the Speaker of
the Assembly.
-
*SB33*

– 32 –
(c) One member appointed by the Majority Leader of the Senate
who represents a nonprofit organization, a local agency or a tribal
government.
(d) One member appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly who
represents a nonprofit organization, a local agency or a tribal
government.
(e) One member appointed by the Governor who represents a
nonprofit organization that provides grants in this State.
(f) One member appointed by the Governor who represents a
local government.
(g) One member appointed by the Governor who represents
private businesses.
(h) The State Treasurer, who may name a designee to serve on
the Council on his or her behalf.
(i) The State Controller, who may name a designee to serve on
the Council on his or her behalf.
(j) The [Chief of the Budget Division] Director of the Office of
Finance.
(k) The Director of the Office of Federal Assistance.
2. The members described in:
(a) Paragraphs (a) to (i), inclusive, of subsection 1 are voting
members.
(b) Paragraphs (j) and (k) of subsection 1 are nonvoting
members.
3. The Governor shall, to the extent practicable, collaborate to
ensure that the persons appointed pursuant to paragraphs (e), (f) and
(g) of subsection 1 are representative of the urban and rural areas of
this State.
4. Each appointed member of the Council serves a term of 2
years.
5. An appointed member of the Council:
(a) May be reappointed.
(b) Shall not serve more than three terms.
6. Any vacancy occurring in the appointed membership of the
Council must be filled in the same manner as the original
appointment not later than 30 days after the vacancy occurs. A
member appointed to fill a vacancy shall serve as a member of the
Council for the remainder of the original term of appointment.
7. Each member of the Council:
(a) Serves without compensation; and
(b) While engaged in the business of the Council, is entitled to
receive the per diem allowance and travel expenses provided for
state officers and employees generally.
8. The Office of Federal Assistance shall provide the Council
with administrative support.
-
*SB33*

– 33 –
Sec. 37. NRS 381.0033 is hereby amended to read as follows:
381.0033 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2:
(a) The private money must be budgeted and expended, within
any limitations which may have been specified by particular donors,
at the discretion of the Board.
(b) The Board or its designee shall submit a report to the Interim
Finance Committee semiannually concerning the investment and
expenditure of the private money in such form and detail as the
Interim Finance Committee determines is necessary.
(c) A separate statement concerning the anticipated amount and
proposed expenditures of the private money must be submitted to
the [Chief of the Budget Division] Director of the Office of Finance
for his or her information at the same time and for the same fiscal
years as the proposed budget of the Department submitted pursuant
to NRS 353.210. The statement must be attached to the proposed
budget of the Department when it is submitted to the Legislature.
2. Any private money which the Board authorizes for use in
funding all or part of a classified or unclassified position or an
independent contractor must be included in the budget prepared for
the Department pursuant to chapter 353 of NRS. The Board shall
transfer to the State Treasurer for deposit in the appropriate general
fund budget account of the Division any money necessary to pay the
payroll costs for the positions that it has agreed to partially or fully
fund from private money. The money must be transferred on a
regular basis at such times as the State Treasurer determines is
necessary.
Sec. 38. NRS 388.700 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.700 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, for
each school quarter of a school year, the ratio in each school district
of pupils per licensed teacher designated to teach, on a full-time
basis, in classes where core curriculum is taught:
(a) In kindergarten and grades 1 and 2, must not exceed 16 to 1,
and in grade 3, must not exceed 18 to 1; or
(b) If a plan is approved pursuant to subsection 3 of NRS
388.720, must not exceed the ratio set forth in that plan for the grade
levels specified in the plan.
 In determining this ratio, all licensed educational personnel who
teach a grade level specified in paragraph (a) or a grade level
specified in a plan that is approved pursuant to subsection 3 of NRS
388.720, as applicable for the school district, must be counted
except teachers of art, music, physical education or special
education, teachers who teach one or two specific subject areas to
more than one classroom of pupils, counselors, librarians,
administrators, deans, specialists, any administrators or other
licensed educational personnel, including, without limitation,
-
*SB33*

– 34 –
counselors, coaches and special education teachers, who may be
present in a classroom but do not teach every pupil in the classroom
and teachers who are not actively teaching pupils during a class
period or who do not teach a subject area for which the ratio of
pupils per licensed teacher is being determined.
2. A school district may, within the limits of any plan adopted
pursuant to NRS 388.720, assign a pupil whose enrollment in a
grade occurs after the end of a quarter during the school year to any
existing class regardless of the number of pupils in the class if the
school district requests and is approved for a variance from the State
Board pursuant to subsection 4.
3. Each school district that includes one or more elementary
schools which exceed the ratio of pupils per class during any quarter
of a school year, as reported to the Department pursuant to
NRS 388.725:
(a) Set forth in subsection 1;
(b) Prescribed in conjunction with a legislative appropriation for
the support of the class-size reduction program; or
(c) Defined by a legislatively approved alternative class-size
reduction plan, if applicable to that school district,
 must request a variance for each such school for the next quarter
of the current school year if a quarter remains in that school year or
for the next quarter of the succeeding school year, as applicable,
from the State Board by providing a written statement that includes
the reasons for the request, the justification for exceeding the
applicable prescribed ratio of pupils per class and a plan of actions
that the school district will take to reduce the ratio of pupils per
class.
4. The State Board may grant to a school district a variance
from the limitation on the number of pupils per class set forth in
paragraph (a), (b) or (c) of subsection 3 for good cause, including
the lack of available financial support specifically set aside for the
reduction of pupil-teacher ratios.
5. The State Board shall, on a quarterly basis, submit a report
to the Interim Finance Committee on each variance requested by a
school district pursuant to subsection 4 during the preceding quarter
and, if a variance was granted, an identification of each elementary
school for which a variance was granted and the specific
justification for the variance.
6. The State Board shall, on or before February 1 of each odd-
numbered year, submit a report to the Legislature on:
(a) Each variance requested by a school district pursuant to
subsection 4 during the preceding biennium and, if a variance was
granted, an identification of each elementary school for which
variance was granted and the specific justification for the variance.
-
*SB33*

– 35 –
(b) The data reported to it by the various school districts
pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 388.710, including an explanation
of that data, and the current pupil-teacher ratios per class in the
grade levels specified in paragraph (a) of subsection 1 or the grade
levels specified in a plan that is approved pursuant to subsection 3
of NRS 388.720, as applicable for the school district.
7. The Department shall, on or before November 15 of each
year, report to the [Chief of the Budget Division] Director of the
Office of Finance and the Fiscal Analysis Division of the
Legislative Counsel Bureau:
(a) The number of teachers employed full-time;
(b) The number of teachers employed in order to attain the ratio
required by subsection 1;
(c) The number of substitute teachers filling vacancies or long-
term positions;
(d) The number of pupils enrolled; and
(e) The number of teachers assigned to teach in the same
classroom with another teacher or in any other arrangement other
than one teacher assigned to one classroom of pupils,
 during the current school year in the grade levels specified in
paragraph (a) of subsection 1 or the grade levels specified in a plan
that is approved pursuant to subsection 3 of NRS 388.720, as
applicable, for each school district.
8. The provisions of this section do not apply to a charter
school or to a program of distance education provided pursuant to
NRS 388.820 to 388.874, inclusive.
Sec. 39. NRS 439.630 is hereby amended to read as follows:
439.630 1. The Department shall:
(a) Conduct, or require the Grants Management Advisory
Committee created by NRS 232.383 to conduct, public hearings to
accept public testimony from a wide variety of sources and
perspectives regarding existing or proposed programs that:
(1) Promote public health;
(2) Improve health services for children, senior citizens and
persons with disabilities;
(3) Reduce or prevent alcohol and other substance use
disorders; and
(4) Offer other general or specific information on health care
in this State.
(b) Establish a process to evaluate the health and health needs of
the residents of this State and a system to rank the health problems
of the residents of this State, including, without limitation, the
specific health problems that are endemic to urban and rural
communities, and report the results of the evaluation to the Joint
-
*SB33*

– 36 –
Interim Standing Committee on Health and Human Services on an
annual basis.
(c) Subject to legislative authorization, allocate money to the
Department to provide grants and enter into contracts or
intergovernmental agreements to pay for prescription drugs,
pharmaceutical services and, to the extent money is available, other
benefits, including, without limitation, dental and vision benefits
and hearing aids or other devices that enhance the ability to hear, for
natural persons who are residents of this State and meet the criteria
for eligibility established by regulation of the Department. From the
money allocated pursuant to this paragraph, the Department may
subsidize any portion of the cost of providing prescription drugs,
pharmaceutical services and, to the extent money is available, other
benefits, including, without limitation, dental and vision benefits
and hearing aids or other devices that enhance the ability to hear, to
such natural persons. The Department shall consider
recommendations from the Grants Management Advisory
Committee in carrying out the provisions of this paragraph. The
Department shall submit an annual report to the Governor, the
Interim Finance Committee, the Joint Interim Standing Committee
on Health and Human Services and any other committees or
commissions the Director deems appropriate regarding the general
manner in which expenditures have been made pursuant to this
paragraph.
(d) Subject to legislative authorization, allocate, by contract or
grant, money for expenditure by the Aging and Disability Services
Division of the Department in the form of grants for existing or new
programs that assist senior citizens and other specified persons with
independent living, including, without limitation, programs that
provide:
(1) Respite care or relief of informal caretakers, including,
without limitation, informal caretakers of any person with
Alzheimer’s disease or other related dementia regardless of the age
of the person;
(2) Transportation to new or existing services to assist senior
citizens in living independently; and
(3) Care in the home which allows senior citizens to remain
at home instead of in institutional care.
 The Aging and Disability Services Division of the Department
shall consider recommendations from the Grants Management
Advisory Committee concerning the independent living needs of
senior citizens.
(e) Allocate $200,000 of all revenues deposited in the Fund for a
Healthy Nevada each year for direct expenditure by the Director to
award competitive grants to finance the establishment, expansion
-
*SB33*

– 37 –
and operation of assisted living facilities that provide services
pursuant to the provisions of the home and community-based
services waiver which are amended pursuant to NRS 422.3962. The
Director shall develop policies and procedures for awarding grants
pursuant to this paragraph that prioritize assisted living facilities that
demonstrate the ability to meet the criteria for certification pursuant
to NRS 319.147. If any money allocated pursuant to this paragraph
remains after awarding grants to all eligible applicants, the Director
must reallocate such money to the Aging and Disability Services
Division of the Department to be used for the purposes described in
paragraph (d).
(f) Subject to legislative authorization, allocate to the Division
money for programs that are consistent with the guidelines
established by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention of the
United States Department of Health and Human Services relating to
evidence-based best practices to prevent, reduce or treat the use of
tobacco and the consequences of the use of tobacco. In making
allocations pursuant to this paragraph, the Division shall allocate the
money, by contract or grant:
(1) To the district board of health in each county whose
population is 100,000 or more for expenditure for such programs in
the respective county;
(2) For such programs in counties whose population is less
than 100,000; and
(3) For statewide programs for tobacco cessation and other
statewide services for tobacco cessation and for statewide
evaluations of programs which receive an allocation of money
pursuant to this paragraph, as determined necessary by the Division
and the district boards of health.
(g) Subject to legislative authorization, allocate, by contract or
grant, money for expenditure for programs that improve the health
and well-being of residents of this State, including, without
limitation, programs that improve health services for children.
(h) Subject to legislative authorization, allocate, by contract or
grant, money for expenditure for programs that improve the health
and well-being of persons with disabilities. In making allocations
pursuant to this paragraph, the Department shall, to the extent
practicable, allocate the money evenly among the following three
types of programs:
(1) Programs that provide respite care or relief of informal
caretakers for persons with disabilities;
(2) Programs that provide positive behavioral supports to
persons with disabilities; and
-
*SB33*

– 38 –
(3) Programs that assist persons with disabilities to live
safely and independently in their communities outside of an
institutional setting.
(i) Maximize expenditures through local, federal and private
matching contributions.
(j) Ensure that any money expended from the Fund will not be
used to supplant existing methods of funding that are available to
public agencies.
(k) Develop policies and procedures for the administration and
distribution of contracts, grants and other expenditures to state
agencies, political subdivisions of this State, nonprofit
organizations, universities, state colleges and community colleges.
A condition of any such contract or grant must be that not more than
8 percent of the contract or grant may be used for administrative
expenses or other indirect costs. The procedures must require at
least one competitive round of requests for proposals per biennium.
(l) To make the allocations required by paragraphs (f), (g)
and (h):
(1) Prioritize and quantify the needs for these programs;
(2) Develop, solicit and accept applications for allocations;
(3) Review and consider the recommendations of the Grants
Management Advisory Committee submitted pursuant to
NRS 232.385;
(4) Conduct annual evaluations of programs to which
allocations have been awarded; and
(5) Submit annual reports concerning the programs to the
Governor, the Interim Finance Committee, the Joint Interim
Standing Committee on Health and Human Services and any other
committees or commissions the Director deems appropriate.
(m) Transmit a report of all findings, recommendations and
expenditures to the Governor, each regular session of the
Legislature, the Joint Interim Standing Committee on Health and
Human Services and any other committees or commissions the
Director deems appropriate.
(n) After considering the recommendations submitted to the
Director pursuant to subsection 6, develop a plan each biennium to
determine the percentage of available money in the Fund for a
Healthy Nevada to be allocated from the Fund for the purposes
described in paragraphs (c), (d), (f), (g) and (h). The plan must be
submitted as part of the proposed budget submitted to the [Chief of
the Budget Division] Director of the Office of Finance pursuant to
NRS 353.210.
(o) On or before September 30 of each even-numbered year,
submit to the Grants Management Advisory Committee, the Nevada
Commission on Aging created by NRS 427A.032 and the Nevada
-
*SB33*

– 39 –
Commission on Services for Persons with Disabilities created by
NRS 427A.1211 a report on the funding plan submitted to the
[Chief of the Budget Division] Director of the Office of Finance
pursuant to paragraph (n).
2. The Department may take such other actions as are
necessary to carry out its duties.
3. To make the allocations required by paragraph (d) of
subsection 1, the Aging and Disability Services Division of the
Department shall:
(a) Prioritize and quantify the needs of senior citizens and other
specified persons for these programs;
(b) Develop, solicit and accept grant applications for allocations;
(c) As appropriate, expand or augment existing state programs
for senior citizens and other specified persons upon approval of the
Interim Finance Committee;
(d) Award grants, contracts or other allocations;
(e) Conduct annual evaluations of programs to which grants or
other allocations have been awarded; and
(f) Submit annual reports concerning the allocations made by
the Aging and Disability Services Division pursuant to paragraph
(d) of subsection 1 to the Governor, the Interim Finance Committee,
the Joint Interim Standing Committee on Health and Human
Services and any other committees or commissions the Director
deems appropriate.
4. The Aging and Disability Services Division of the
Department shall submit each proposed grant or contract which
would be used to expand or augment an existing state program to
the Interim Finance Committee for approval before the grant or
contract is awarded. The request for approval must include a
description of the proposed use of the money and the person or
entity that would be authorized to expend the money. The Aging
and Disability Services Division of the Department shall not expend
or transfer any money allocated to the Aging and Disability Services
Division pursuant to this section to subsidize any portion of the cost
of providing prescription drugs, pharmaceutical services and other
benefits, including, without limitation, dental and vision benefits
and hearing aids or other devices that enhance the ability to hear
pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection 1.
5. A veteran may receive benefits or other services which are
available from the money allocated pursuant to this section for
senior citizens or persons with disabilities to the extent that the
veteran does not receive other benefits or services provided to
veterans for the same purpose if the veteran qualifies for the benefits
or services as a senior citizen or a person with a disability, or both.
-
*SB33*

– 40 –
6. On or before June 30 of each even-numbered year, the
Grants Management Advisory Committee, the Nevada Commission
on Aging and the Nevada Commission on Services for Persons with
Disabilities each shall submit to the Director a report that includes,
without limitation, recommendations regarding community needs
and priorities that are determined by each such entity after any
public hearings held by the entity.
Sec. 40. NRS 501.337 is hereby amended to read as follows:
501.337 The Director shall:
1. Carry out the policies and regulations of the Commission.
2. Direct and supervise all administrative and operational
activities of the Department, and all programs administered by the
Department as provided by law. Except as otherwise provided in
NRS 284.143, the Director shall devote his or her entire time to the
duties of the office and shall not follow any other gainful
employment or occupation.
3. Within such limitations as may be provided by law, organize
the Department and, from time to time with the consent of the
Commission, may alter the organization. The Director shall reassign
responsibilities and duties as he or she may deem appropriate.
4. Appoint or remove such technical, clerical and operational
staff as the execution of his or her duties and the operation of the
Department may require, and all those employees are responsible to
the Director for the proper carrying out of the duties and
responsibilities of their respective positions. The Director shall
designate a number of employees as game wardens and provide for
their training.
5. Submit technical and other reports to the Commission as
may be necessary or as may be requested, which will enable the
Commission to establish policy and regulations.
6. Prepare, in consultation with the Commission, the biennial
budget of the Department consistent with the provisions of this title,
chapter 488 of NRS and NRS 701.610 to 701.640, inclusive, and
submit it to the Commission for its review and recommendation
before the budget is submitted to the [Chief of the Budget Division]
Director of the Office of Finance pursuant to NRS 353.210.
7. Administer real property assigned to the Department.
8. Maintain full control, by proper methods and inventories, of
all personal property of the State acquired and held for the purposes
contemplated by this title and by chapter 488 of NRS.
9. Act as nonvoting Secretary to the Commission.
10. Adopt the regulations required pursuant to NRS 701.610
and 701.630.
-
*SB33*

– 41 –
Sec. 41. NRS 501.3585 is hereby amended to read as follows:
501.3585 1. The Department shall establish the Wildlife
Trust Fund. The Department may accept any gift, donation, bequest
or devise from any private source for deposit in the Wildlife Trust
Fund. All money must be accounted for in the Wildlife Trust Fund.
2. As soon as practicable after receiving any gift, donation,
bequest or devise for an unanticipated emergency event from any
private source pursuant to subsection 1 that is exempt from the
provisions of NRS 353.335 pursuant to paragraph (e) of subsection
6 of NRS 353.335, the Director or the Director’s designee shall
submit to the Commission and the Interim Finance Committee a
report which states:
(a) The unanticipated emergency event for which the gift,
donation, bequest or devise was received;
(b) The amount of the gift, donation, bequest or devise;
(c) The amount of the gift, donation, bequest or devise that was
expended for the unanticipated emergency event; and
(d) The private source from which the gift, donation, bequest or
devise was received.
3. All of the money in the Wildlife Trust Fund must be
deposited in a financial institution to draw interest or to be
expended, invested and reinvested pursuant to the specific
instructions of the donor, or if no such specific instructions exist, in
the sound discretion of the Director. The provisions of NRS 356.011
apply to any accounts in financial institutions maintained pursuant
to this section.
4. The money in the Wildlife Trust Fund must be budgeted and
expended, within any limitations which may have been specified by
particular donors, at the discretion of the Director. The Director may
authorize independent contractors that may be funded in whole or in
part from the money in the Wildlife Trust Fund.
5. The Director or the Director’s designee shall annually post
on the Internet website maintained by the Department a statement
setting forth the investment and expenditure of the money in the
Wildlife Trust Fund.
6. A separate statement concerning the anticipated amount and
proposed expenditures of the money in the Wildlife Trust Fund must
be submitted to the Director of the Office of Finance for his or her
information at the same time and for the same fiscal years as the
requested budget of the Department submitted to the [Chief of the
Budget Division] Director of the Office of Finance pursuant to NRS
353.210. The statement must be attached to the requested budget for
the Department when the requested budget is submitted to the Fiscal
Analysis Division of the Legislative Counsel Bureau pursuant to
NRS 353.211.
-
*SB33*

– 42 –
7. The provisions of chapter 333 of NRS do not apply to the
expenditure of money in the Wildlife Trust Fund.
8. As used in this section, “unanticipated emergency event”
means:
(a) The unanticipated spread of a communicable disease among
wildlife in this State;
(b) Drought conditions in this State that the Department
determines to be extreme;
(c) A wildfire or the rehabilitation efforts related to a wildfire; or
(d) Any other similar unanticipated event that puts wildlife,
wildlife habitat or human life at risk.
Sec. 42. NRS 701A.110 is hereby amended to read as follows:
701A.110 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the
Director, in consultation with the Office of Economic Development,
shall grant a partial abatement from the portion of the taxes imposed
pursuant to chapter 361 of NRS, other than any taxes imposed for
public education, on a building or other structure that is determined
to meet the equivalent of the silver level or higher by an
independent contractor authorized to make that determination in
accordance with the Green Building Rating System adopted by the
Director pursuant to NRS 701A.100, if:
(a) No funding is provided by any governmental entity in this
State for the acquisition, design, construction or renovation of the
building or other structure or for the acquisition of any land therefor.
For the purposes of this paragraph:
(1) Private activity bonds must not be considered funding
provided by a governmental entity.
(2) The term “private activity bond” has the meaning
ascribed to it in 26 U.S.C. § 141.
(b) The owner of the property:
(1) Submits an application for the partial abatement to the
Director before July 1, 2021. If such an application is submitted for
a project that has not been completed on the date of that submission
and there is a significant change in the scope of the project after that
date, the application must be amended to include the change or
changes.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this subparagraph,
provides to the Director, within 48 months after applying for the
partial abatement, proof that the building or other structure meets
the equivalent of the silver level or higher, as determined by an
independent contractor authorized to make that determination in
accordance with the Green Building Rating System adopted by the
Director pursuant to NRS 701A.100. The Director may, for good
cause shown, extend the period for providing such proof.
-
*SB33*

– 43 –
(3) Files a copy of each application and amended application
submitted to the Director pursuant to subparagraph (1) with the:
(I) [Chief of the Budget Division] Director of the Office
of Finance;
(II) Department of Taxation;
(III) County assessor;
(IV) County treasurer;
(V) Office of Economic Development;
(VI) Board of county commissioners; and
(VII) City manager and city council, if any.
(c) The abatement is consistent with the State Plan for Economic
Development developed by the Executive Director of the Office of
Economic Development pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 231.053.
2. The Director shall not approve an application for a partial
abatement of the taxes imposed pursuant to chapter 361 of NRS
submitted pursuant to this section by the owner of the property
unless the application is approved or deemed approved by the board
of county commissioners pursuant to this subsection. The board of
county commissioners of a county must provide notice to the
Director that the board intends to consider an application and, if
such notice is given, must approve or deny the application not later
than 30 days after the board receives a copy of the application. The
board of county commissioners:
(a) Shall, in considering an application pursuant to this
subsection, make a recommendation to the Director regarding the
application;
(b) May, in considering an application pursuant to this
subsection, deny an application only if the board of county
commissioners determines, based on relevant information, that:
(1) The projected cost of the services that the local
government is required to provide to the building or other structure
for which the abatement is received will exceed the amount of tax
revenue that the local government is projected to receive as a result
of the abatement; or
(2) The projected financial benefits that will result to the
county from any employment resulting from the use of the building
or other structure and from capital investments by the owner of the
building or other structure in the county will not exceed the
projected loss of tax revenue that will result from the abatement; and
(c) May, without regard to whether the board has provided
notice to the Director of its intent to consider the application, make a
recommendation to the Director regarding the application.
 If the board of county commissioners does not approve or deny
the application pursuant to this subsection within 30 days after the
-
*SB33*

– 44 –
board receives a copy of the application, the application shall be
deemed approved.
3. As soon as practicable after the Director receives the
application and proof required by subsection 1, the Director, in
consultation with the Office of Economic Development, shall
determine whether the building or other structure is eligible for the
abatement and, if so, forward a certificate of eligibility for the
abatement to the:
(a) Department of Taxation;
(b) County assessor;
(c) County treasurer; and
(d) Office of Economic Development.
4. The Director may, with the assistance of the [Chief of the
Budget Division] Director of the Office of Finance and the
Department of Taxation, publish a fiscal note that indicates an
estimate of the fiscal impact of the partial abatement on the State
and on each affected local government. If the Director publishes a
fiscal note that estimates the fiscal impact of the partial abatement
on local government, the Director shall forward a copy of the fiscal
note to each affected local government. As soon as practicable after
receiving a copy of a certificate of eligibility pursuant to subsection
3, the Department of Taxation shall forward a copy of the certificate
to each affected local government.
5. The partial abatement for:
(a) A building or other structure must, except as otherwise
provided in paragraph (b), be for a duration of not more than 10
years and in an annual amount that equals, for a building or other
structure that meets the equivalent of:
(1) The silver level, 25 percent of the portion of the taxes
imposed pursuant to chapter 361 of NRS, other than any taxes
imposed for public education, that would otherwise be owed for the
building or other structure, excluding the associated land;
(2) The gold level, 30 percent of the portion of the taxes
imposed pursuant to chapter 361 of NRS, other than any taxes
imposed for public education, that would otherwise be owed for the
building or other structure, excluding the associated land; or
(3) The platinum level, 35 percent of the portion of the taxes
imposed pursuant to chapter 361 of NRS, other than any taxes
imposed for public education, that would otherwise be owed for the
building or other structure, excluding the associated land.
(b) A building or other structure that qualifies for an abatement
under the Leadership in Energy and Environmental Design
“Existing Buildings: Operations and Maintenance” rating system, or
its equivalent, must be for a duration of not more than 5 years and in
an annual amount that equals, except as otherwise provided in
-
*SB33*

– 45 –
subsection 6, for a building or other structure that meets the
equivalent of:
(1) The silver level, 25 percent of the portion of the taxes
imposed pursuant to chapter 361 of NRS, other than any taxes
imposed for public education, that would otherwise be owed for the
building or other structure, excluding the associated land;
(2) The gold level, 30 percent of the portion of the taxes
imposed pursuant to chapter 361 of NRS, other than any taxes
imposed for public education, that would otherwise be owed for the
building or other structure, excluding the associated land; or
(3) The platinum level, 35 percent of the portion of the taxes
imposed pursuant to chapter 361 of NRS, other than any taxes
imposed for public education, that would otherwise be owed for the
building or other structure, excluding the associated land.
6. The Director shall not grant a partial abatement of more than
$100,000 in any year for a building or other structure that qualifies
for an abatement pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 5.
7. A partial abatement granted pursuant to this section:
(a) Does not apply during any period in which the owner of the
building or other structure is receiving another abatement or
exemption pursuant to this chapter or NRS 361.045 to 361.159,
inclusive, from the taxes imposed pursuant to chapter 361 of NRS.
(b) Terminates upon any determination by the Director that the
building or other structure has ceased to meet the equivalent of the
silver level or higher. The Director shall provide notice and a
reasonable opportunity to cure any noncompliance issues before
making a determination that the building or other structure has
ceased to meet that standard. The Director shall immediately
provide notice of each determination of termination to the:
(1) Department of Taxation, who shall immediately notify
each affected local government of the determination;
(2) County assessor;
(3) County treasurer; and
(4) Office of Economic Development.
8. If a partial abatement terminates pursuant to paragraph (b) of
subsection 7, the owner of the property to which the partial
abatement applied shall repay to the county treasurer the amount of
the exemption that was allowed pursuant to this section before the
date of that termination. The owner shall, in addition to the amount
of the exemption required to be paid pursuant to this subsection, pay
interest on the amount due at the rate most recently established
pursuant to NRS 99.040 for each month, or portion thereof, from the
last day of the month following the period for which the payment
would have been made had the partial abatement not been approved
until the date of payment of the tax.
-
*SB33*

– 46 –
9. The Director, in consultation with the Office of Economic
Development, shall adopt regulations:
(a) Establishing the qualifications and methods to determine
eligibility for and the duration of the abatement;
(b) Prescribing such forms as will ensure that all information
and other documentation necessary to make an appropriate
determination is filed with the Director; and
(c) Prescribing the criteria for determining when there is a
significant change in the scope of a project for the purposes of
subparagraph (1) of paragraph (b) of subsection 1,
 and the Department of Taxation shall adopt such additional
regulations as it determines to be appropriate to carry out the
provisions of this section.
10. The Director shall:
(a) Cooperate with the Office of Economic Development in
carrying out the provisions of this section; and
(b) Submit to the Office of Economic Development an annual
report, at such a time and containing such information as the Office
may require, regarding the partial abatements granted pursuant to
this section.
11. The Director may charge and collect a fee from each
applicant who submits an application for a partial abatement
pursuant to this section. The amount of the fee must not exceed the
actual cost to the Director for processing the application and
evaluating the proof submitted by the applicant pursuant to
subsection 1 and making the determination concerning eligibility for
the partial abatement required by subsection 3.
12. As used in this section:
(a) “Building or other structure” does not include any building
or other structure for which the principal use is as a residential
dwelling for not more than four families.
(b) “Director” means the Director of the Office of Energy
appointed pursuant to NRS 701.150.
(c) “Taxes imposed for public education” means:
(1) Any ad valorem tax authorized or required by chapter
387 of NRS;
(2) Any ad valorem tax authorized or required by chapter
350 of NRS for the obligations of a school district, including,
without limitation, any ad valorem tax necessary to carry out the
provisions of subsection 5 of NRS 350.020; and
(3) Any other ad valorem tax for which the proceeds thereof
are dedicated to the public education of pupils in kindergarten
through grade 12.
-
*SB33*

– 47 –
Sec. 43. NRS 701A.360 is hereby amended to read as follows:
701A.360 1. A person who intends to locate a facility for the
generation of process heat from solar renewable energy, a wholesale
facility for the generation of electricity from renewable energy, a
facility for the storage of energy from renewable generation or a
hybrid renewable generation and energy storage facility in this State
may apply to the Director for a partial abatement of the local sales
and use taxes, the taxes imposed pursuant to chapter 361 of NRS, or
both local sales and use taxes and taxes imposed pursuant to chapter
361 of NRS. An applicant may submit a copy of the application to
the board of county commissioners at any time after the applicant
has submitted the application to the Director.
2. A facility that is owned, operated, leased or otherwise
controlled by a governmental entity is not eligible for an abatement
pursuant to NRS 701A.300 to 701A.390, inclusive.
3. As soon as practicable after the Director receives an
application for a partial abatement, the Director shall forward a copy
of the application to:
(a) The [Chief of the Budget Division] Director of the Office of
Finance;
(b) The Department of Taxation;
(c) The board of county commissioners;
(d) The county assessor;
(e) The county treasurer; and
(f) The Office of Economic Development.
4. With the copy of the application forwarded to the county
treasurer, the Director shall include a notice that the local
jurisdiction may request a presentation regarding the facility. A
request for a presentation must be made within 30 days after receipt
of the application.
5. The Director shall hold a public hearing on the application.
The hearing must not be held earlier than 30 days after all persons
listed in subsection 3 have received a copy of the application.
Sec. 44. NRS 701A.375 is hereby amended to read as follows:
701A.375 1. The Director may, with the assistance of the
[Chief of the Budget Division] Director of the Office of Finance and
the Department of Taxation, publish a fiscal note that indicates an
estimate of the fiscal impact of the partial abatement on the State
and on each affected local government. If the Director publishes a
fiscal note that estimates the fiscal impact of the partial abatement
on local government, the Director shall forward a copy of the fiscal
note to each affected local government and to the Office of
Economic Development.
2. As soon as practicable after receiving a copy of a certificate
of eligibility pursuant to NRS 701A.370, the Department of
-
*SB33*

– 48 –
Taxation shall forward a copy of the certificate to each affected
local government.
Sec. 45. The Legislative Counsel shall, in preparing
supplements to the Nevada Administrative Code, appropriately
change any references to an officer, agency or other entity whose
name is changed or whose responsibilities are transferred pursuant
to the provisions of this act to refer to the appropriate officer,
agency or other entity.
Sec. 46. 1. Any administrative regulations adopted by an
officer or an agency whose name has been changed or whose
responsibilities have been transferred pursuant to the provisions of
this act to another officer or agency remain in force until amended
by the officer or agency to which the responsibility for the adoption
of the regulations has been transferred.
2. Any contracts or other agreements entered into by an officer
or agency whose name has been changed or whose responsibilities
have been transferred pursuant to the provisions of this act to
another officer or agency are binding upon the officer or agency to
which the responsibility for the administration of the provisions of
the contract or other agreement has been transferred. Such contracts
and other agreements may be enforced by the officer or agency to
which the responsibility for the enforcement of the provisions of the
contract or other agreement has been transferred.
3. Any action taken by an officer or agency whose name has
been changed or whose responsibilities have been transferred
pursuant to the provisions of this act to another officer or agency
remains in effect as if taken by the officer or agency to which the
responsibility for the enforcement of such actions has been
transferred.
Sec. 47. NRS 353.155, 353.160 and 353.530 are hereby
repealed.
Sec. 48. 1. This section and sections 1 to 41, inclusive, and
45, 46 and 47 of this act become effective on July 1, 2025.
2. Section 42 of this act becomes effective on July 1, 2025, and
expires by limitation on June 30, 2035.
3. Sections 43 and 44 of this act become effective on July 1,
2025, and expire by limitation on June 30, 2049.
-
*SB33*

– 49 –
TEXT OF REPEALED SECTIONS
353.155 “Chief” defined. As used in NRS 353.150 to
353.246, inclusive, “Chief” means the Chief of the Budget Division
of the Office of Finance.
353.160 Administration. The Budget Division of the Office
of Finance shall administer the provisions of NRS 353.150 to
353.246, inclusive, except NRS 353.226 to 353.229, inclusive,
subject to administrative supervision by the Director of the Office of
Finance.
353.530 “Chief” defined. “Chief” means the Chief of the
Budget Division of the Office of Finance.
H
-
*SB33*